Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3233
Districts; water rights, waterworks, and property; acquisition; disposal.

Each district shall have the power and authority to acquire and dispose of water rights in accordance with Chapter 46, article 2, to acquire by grant, purchase, bequest, devise, or lease and to hold and use waterworks, personal property, and interests in or title to real property, and to sell, lease, encumber, or otherwise dispose of such waterworks and property. Each district shall also have the power and authority to acquire, construct, own, operate, control, maintain, and use any and all such works and facilities, both within and without the district, necessary to carry out its authorized purposes and furnish water service for domestic, irrigation, power, manufacturing, and other beneficial purposes.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 33, p. 122;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 12;

Laws 1998, LB 896, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 436, § 7.

A water right applicant has no transferable property right in a mere application to divert water. In re Applications A-15145, A-15146, A-15147, and A-15148, 230 Neb. 580, 433 N.W.2d 161 (1988).